Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXII Levees, Drainage, and Reclamation of Lands
CHAPTER 268 Drainage and Reclamation Act of 1918
268.540.
Construction — Payment of cost and maintenance of bridge over drain crossing right-of-way of railroad or other franchise corporation.

If any drain is constructed in any district which crosses the right-of-way of a railroad or any corporation operating under a franchise, at any place other than at a natural depression in the earth or a watercourse, the railroad or corporation shall construct the bridge or culvert at the point where required. The expense shall be borne by the district, to be paid as part of the damages for the right-of-way in going across the railroad or corporation right-of-way and to be included in the judgment entered therefor. The railroad company or the corporation shall thereafter maintain the bridge or culvert and make any necessary changes.

History.

2380b-37.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Location of drains and ditches crossing railroad right-of-way. 37 A.L.R. 219; 82 A.L.R. 425.

Municipal liability arising from negligence or other wrongful act in carrying out construction or repair of sewers and drains. 61 A.L.R.2d 874.

Municipal Liability for Damage Resulting from Obstruction or Clogging of Drain or Sewer, 54 A.L.R.6th 201.

268.550.
Drain crossing public highway — When county constructs bridge or culvert.

If a drain improving any channel or watercourse in a district is on the line of any natural depression or watercourse which crosses any public highway where there is no bridge or culvert or opening in the highway sufficient to allow the flow of water in the drain as improved, the board shall give notice to the road commissioners or road engineer to construct or enlarge the bridge, culvert or opening to meet the improvement, stating the dimensions required. The road commissioners or engineer shall, within thirty (30) days from the time notice is served, make the improvement required.

If they fail or refuse to do so, then the board shall construct or enlarge the bridge, culvert or opening at the expense of the county, and the fiscal court shall reimburse the board for the cost of the work. If the fiscal court refuses to reimburse the board, it may enforce their right of reimbursement in any court having jurisdiction.

History.

2380b-36.

268.560.
Natural drain into which public drain empties to be under board — Removal of obstructions in public drain.

Whenever any public drain, established and constructed under this chapter or under any statute in force prior to June 18, 1918, empties into a natural drain, the natural drain, from the mouth of the public drain to the mouth of the natural drain, shall become to all intents and purposes a public drain, and subject to the supervision and control of the board.

Whenever any obstruction exists in any natural drain which is an outlet for any public drain, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, and the removal of the obstruction is necessary, in the opinion of the board, for the successful operation of the public drain, the board may remove the obstruction, paying the cost out of funds collected from any district for which it is an outlet. If there is more than one (1), the expenses shall be prorated between them as the board considers equitable.

History.

2380b-58, 2380b-59.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Municipality’s liability for damage from obstruction or clogging of drain or sewer due to unusual or extraordinary rainfall. 59 A.L.R.2d 324.

268.570.
Owner may use drain as outlet — May condemn intervening land.

Any owner may use the drain as an outlet for lateral ditches from his land. If his land is separated from the drain by the land of another and they are unable to agree as to the conditions on which one may enter another’s land and construct the ditch, he may file his ancillary petition in the pending proceeding to the court, and secure condemnation as provided for in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. When the ditch is constructed, it shall become a part of the drainage system and shall be under the control of the board and kept in repair by it.

History.

2380b-48: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 105.

268.580.
Owner to pay for damage to improvement caused by him — No person to obstruct improvement.

If repairs to any improvement become necessary by reason of the act or negligence of any owner or his servant, agent, or stock, by which the improvement is obstructed, any repairs necessary to restore it to its previous condition shall be made by the owner at his own expense. Upon his failure to make the repairs within thirty (30) days after being notified by the board, he shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

The board may have the obstruction removed, paying the cost out of funds collected from any district for which it is an outlet or of which it is a part, and if there is more than one the expense shall be prorated between them. All amounts so paid with interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum shall be charged to the owner in fault, and may be recovered by the board in any court of competent jurisdiction, and shall constitute a lien upon the land of such owner. When any such amount is recovered it shall be returned to the fund from which it was paid.

No person shall damage or in any way obstruct any drain, levee or other improvement, or place any flood gate, bridge or fence across it without consent of the board, by order entered upon its record, in which shall be specified the kind of flood gate, bridge or fence, and it shall be erected in accordance with the order.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this section.

History.

2380b-53.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Directors of sanitary district may clean out streams, KRS

220.280

.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Petition to Require Ditch to be Cleaned, Form 338.02.

ALR

Liability of landowner for damages caused by overflow, seepage, or the like resulting from defect in artificial underground drain, conduit, or pipe. 44 A.L.R.2d 960.

Modern status of rules governing interference with drainage of surface waters. 93 A.L.R.3d 1193.

268.590.
Board may amend plan for reclamation so as to provide for additional improvements — May levy additional assessments.

If the work set out in the plan for reclamation of any district is found insufficient to reclaim all of the property of the district, the board may formulate new or amended plans containing new improvements or providing for the enlargement of existing improvements. Additional assessments may be made in proportion to the increased benefits accruing to the property because of the additional improvements.

If it is found at any time that the amount of total assessments is insufficient to pay the cost of improvements in the plan for reclamation, or additional work done under the provisions of this section, the board of drainage commissioners may make additional levies to provide funds to complete the work.

The total of all levies of assessments shall not exceed the total amount of benefits assessed.

History.

2380b-44: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 253, effective January 2, 1978.

268.600.
Court, upon petition, may extend district — Amend plan for reclamation — Appoint appraisers — Notice.

The board, or the owners of property adjacent to the district who desire to have their property made a part of the district, may file a petition with the clerk of the fiscal court organizing the district praying the court to amend its former order organizing the district, by correcting the plan, striking out or adding the names of owners or property, or by any other means. If the petition asks permission to change the plan for reclamation or that the boundary lines be changed, it shall also ask for three (3) appraisers to be appointed as provided in KRS

268.260

for the original proceedings.

As soon as the petition is filed, the clerk of the fiscal court shall give notice as other notice is given, and substantially in the following form:

“ Court. Commonwealth of Kentucky. To , Greeting: “(Name of owner of land) “To the owners and all persons interested in the property in and adjacent to (drainage), (levee), (reclamation) district No. of County (Counties), Kentucky. “(Here insert the names of all persons who are shown in the petition to own land sought to be annexed to the district). “You are hereby notified that (here state by whom petition was filed) has filed in the office of the clerk of the court a petition praying the court for permission to (here insert the prayer of the said petition) (and if it contains a prayer to annex land, describe the land), and unless you show cause to the contrary on or before the day of , 19, the prayer of this petition may be granted. “This day of , 19 Clerk.”

Click to view

History.

2380b-46: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 254, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Drainage, Reclamation, and Sewer Districts, § 338.00.

ALR

Constitutionality of statutes for formation or change of drainage districts. 69 A.L.R. 285.

268.610.
Hearing on petition to amend plan — Duties of clerk after judgment — Compensation — Order of appraisal — Costs.

Any owner who will be affected by the proposed changes, amendments and corrections enumerated in the petition provided for in KRS

268.600

, may file objections to the granting of the prayer of the petition by the date named in the notice. The fiscal court will hear such petition and all objections filed against it in a summary manner and enter its order. The clerk of the court shall within fifteen (15) days after the entering of the order, transmit a certified copy of the order and a copy of the petition to the secretary of the board, who shall transmit a copy to the county clerk of each county in which any property in the district is located. The clerk shall file and preserve these copies in his office, for which he shall receive a fee of one dollar ($1). If the order of the court provides that the plan for reclamation be changed or the boundary lines of the district extended, the board shall direct the appraisers to appraise the property to be taken, assess benefits and damages and estimate the cost of the improvements as in KRS

268.260

and

268.270

. The appraisers’ report shall be treated in the same manner as is now provided for in the original formation of districts. If the petition is dismissed the party filing it shall pay the costs, but if it is sustained in whole or in part the objectors shall pay the costs.

History.

2380b-47: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 255, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 419, effective June 17, 1978.

268.620.
Use of other improvements or property in plan to prevent overflow.

If the plan for reclamation in any district relates in part to the drainage of the lands and in part to the prevention of overflowing of lands within the district from any stream or body of water coming from without the district, any stream, drain, cut or depression, or any fill, levee or embankment may be used as part of the reclamation system by changing it in any way, if the efficiency thereof to the owner is not impaired.

History.

2380b-50.

268.630.
Improvements of other authorities not affected — Joint use — Appropriations by county or city to aid district.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive the fiscal court or other governing authority of any county or city of its jurisdiction and control over any levee or drain established or constructed under its authority. However, any such improvement may be used as an outlet for any drain established under this chapter, and the governing authority of the county or city may, in its discretion, delegate to the board jurisdiction and control or a joint use and control over the improvement upon any conditions agreed upon between them. This agreement shall be written, approved by the parties to it, and recorded upon the minutes of the proceedings of both bodies.

The fiscal court or other governing authority of the county or city may, when in its judgment the public interests and welfare justify it, make appropriations to aid any district in constructing or maintaining any improvement provided for in this chapter or under the control of the board.

History.

2380b-57.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A board of drainage commissioners could agree to pay costs above $100,000 for clearing of the channel of the Salt River and the fiscal court could make appropriations to assist in construction and maintenance of this improvement subject to the debt limitations of the constitution.

OAG 63-869

.

268.640.
Distribution of funds on dissolution of district.

If upon the dissolution of any district organized under this chapter any money is in the hands of the treasurer, after all liabilities of the district are satisfied, it shall be prorated to the several pieces of property according to the assessed benefits in the organization of the district. The prorata share shall be paid to the then owner of the property.

History.

2380b-61: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 256, effective January 2, 1978.

268.650.
Discontinuance of improvement.

In counties containing not more than one (1) drainage district established under Chapter 268 of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, or under the Act of 1918 from which it came, twenty-five percent (25%) of the landowners, or the owners of twenty-five percent (25%) of the land, may, at any time petition the fiscal court for a discontinuation of the improvement. The petition shall give the names of all persons interested in the maintenance of the improvement and owning land in the district. The court shall conduct a hearing on the matter, and shall issue notices thereof at least fifteen (15) days before the hearing and cause them to be served upon all parties interested, notifying them that the court will consider them at the hearing. If no valid reason is shown against the discontinuance of the improvement, the court shall enter an order discontinuing it, after which it shall cease to be a public improvement. An appeal may be had from the order to the Circuit Court, as provided in the establishment of improvements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 109, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 257, effective January 2, 1978.

268.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

268.580

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

2380b-49, 2380b-53: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 100, § 29, effective July 13, 1984.